Massachusetts, session 194th, H1688.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 269 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:- 
Section 20. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless context clearly 
requires otherwise, have the following meanings:- 
“Critical infrastructure facility”, if completely enclosed by a fence or other physical 
barrier designed to exclude intruders, or if marked with a sign conspicuously posted on the 
property that indicates that entry is forbidden: (i) a petroleum or alumina refinery; (ii) an 
electrical power generating facility, substation, switching station or electrical control center; (iii) 
a chemical, polymer or rubber manufacturing facility; (iv) a water intake structure, water 
treatment facility, wastewater treatment plant or pump station; (v) a natural gas compressor 

of 3 10 station; (vi) a liquid natural gas terminal or storage facility; (vii) a telecommunications central 
switching office; (viii) a port, railroad switching yard, trucking terminal or other freight 
transportation facility; (ix) a gas processing plant, including a plant used in the processing, 
treatment or fractionation of natural gas; (x) a transmission facility used by a federally licensed 
radio or television station; (xi) a steelmaking facility that uses an electric arc furnace to make 
steel; (xii) any portion of an aboveground oil, gas or chemical pipeline; or (xiii) a correctional 
facility or law enforcement facility.  
“Unmanned aerial vehicle”, an aircraft that is operated without the possibility of direct 
human intervention from within or on the aircraft. 
(b) Whoever, without lawful authority, weaponizes an unmanned aerial vehicle or 
operates a weaponized unmanned aerial vehicle shall be punished by imprisonment in the state 
prison for not less than 3 years nor more than 20 years or imprisonment in the house of 
correction for not less than 6 months nor more than 2 ½ years, or by fine of not less than $1,000 
nor more than $50,000, or by both such fine and imprisonment. 
(c) Whoever willfully uses an unmanned aerial vehicle to photograph, videotape or 
electronically surveil another person when the other person in such place and circumstance 
would have a reasonable expectation of privacy in not being so photographed, videotaped or 
electronically surveilled, and without that person's knowledge and consent, shall be punished by 
imprisonment in the house of correction for not more than 2 ½ years or by a fine of not more 
than $5,000, or by both such fine and imprisonment. 
(d) Whoever, without lawful authority, willfully uses an unmanned aerial vehicle to 
photograph, videotape or electronically surveil a critical infrastructure facility, shall be punished 

of 3 32 by imprisonment in the house of correction for not more than 2 ½ years or by a fine of not more 
than $5,000, or by both such fine and imprisonment.